Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.220

Town clerk—Duties.

The town clerk shall be custodian of the seal of the town. The town clerk may appoint a deputy for whose acts he or she and his or her bondspersons shall be responsible. The town clerk and his or her deputy may administer oaths or affirmations and certify to them, and may take affidavits and depositions to be used in any court or proceeding in the state.

The town clerk shall make a quarterly statement in writing showing the receipts and expenditures of the town for the preceding quarter and the amount remaining in the treasury.

At the end of every fiscal year the town clerk shall make a full and detailed statement of receipts and expenditures of the preceding year and a full statement of the financial condition of the town which shall be published.

The town clerk shall perform such other services as may be required by statute or by ordinances of the town council.

The town clerk shall keep a full and true account of all the proceedings of the council.

[ 2007 c 218 s 76; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.220. Prior: 1890 p 210 s 170, part; RRS s 9188, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.